tests/verbs-test-2.yaml
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) iv.aa p2.sg":
    mikemos<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemikemosi
    chikhike<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kchikhike
    shilenche<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kshilenche
    tixam<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktixemwi
    wesk<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kewesksi
    shixenchuwe<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kshixenchuwe
    shixukwe<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kshixukwe
    shixhemps<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kshixhempsa

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch17) iv.aa p3.sg":
    kish<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kishi
    kwech<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kwechi
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) iv.aa p3.sg":
    mikemos<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kishi
    chikhike<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kwechi
    shilenche<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kishi
    tixam<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kwechi
    wesk<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kishi
    shixenchuwe<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kwechi
    shixukwe<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kishi
    shixhemps<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kwechi
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch17) iv.aa p1.excl.pl": 
    kish<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkishihena
    kewch<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : nkwechihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) iv.aa p1.excl.pl": 
    mikemos<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkishihena
    chikhike<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : nkwechihena
    shilenche<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkishihena
    tixam<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : nkwechihena
    wesk<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkishihena
    shixenchuwe<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : nkwechihena
    shixukwe<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkishihena
    shixhemps<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : nkwechihena
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch17) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    kish<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kishihena
    kewch<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kwechihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    mikemos<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kemikemosihena
    chikhike<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kchikhikehena
    shilenche<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kshilenchehena
    tixam<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktixemwihena
    wesk<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kewesksihena    
    shixenchuwe<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kshixenchuwehena
    shixukwe<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kshixukwehena
    shixhemps<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kshixhempsahena
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch17) iv.aa p2.pl":
    kish<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kishihemo
    kewch<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kwechihemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) iv.aa p2.pl":
    mikemos<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kemikemosihemo
    chikhike<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kchikhikehemo
    shilenche<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kshilenchehemo
    tixam<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktixemwihemo
    wesk<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kewesksihemo
    shixenchuwe<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kshixenchuwehemo
    shixukwe<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kshixukwehemo
    shixhemps<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kshixhempsahemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch17) iv.aa p3.pl":
    kish<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kishiyok
    kewch<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kewchiyok 
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) iv.aa p3.pl":
    mikemos<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : mikemosuwak
    chikhike<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : chikhikeyok
    shilenche<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : shilencheyok
    tixam<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : tixemuwak
    wesk<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : wesksuwak
    shixenchuwe<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : shixenchuweyok
    shixukwe<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : shixukweyok
    shixhemps<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : shixhempseyok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) iv.aa p1":
    achim<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntachimwi
    ika tatu<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ika ntatu
    wink<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : newinki

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) iv.aa p1":
    alai<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntalai
    weskahp<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : neweskhapi
    kwetk<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkwetki
    wik<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : newiki
    ahchinkx<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntahchinkxi

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) iv.aa p2.sg":
    achim<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktachimwi
    ika tatu<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ika ktatu
    wink<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kewinki

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) iv.aa p2.sg":
    alai<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktalai
    weskahp<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : keweskahpi
    kwetk<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kwetki
    wik<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kewiki
    anchinkx<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktahchinkxi

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) iv.aa p3.sg":
    achim<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : achimu
    ika tatu<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : ika tatu
    wink<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : winki

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) iv.aa p3.sg":
    alai<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : alai
    weskahp<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : wiskahpu
    kwetk<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kwetki
    wik<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : wiku
    anchinkx<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : ahchinkxe

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) iv.aa p1.excl.pl": 
    achim<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntachimwihena
    ika tatu<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : ika ntatuhena
    wink<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : n/a #no form listed in textbook

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) iv.aa p1.excl.pl": 
    alai<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntalaihena
    weskahp<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : neweskahpihena
    kwetk<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : kwetkihena
    wik<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : newikihena
    anchinkx<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : ntahchinkxi
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    achim<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktachimwihena
    ika tatu<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ika ktatuhena
    wink<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : n/a #no form listed in textbook

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    alai<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktalaihena
    weskahp<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : keweskahpihena
    kwetk<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kwetkihena
    wik<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kewikihena
    anchinkx<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktachinkxihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) iv.aa p2.pl":
    achim<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktachimwihemo
    ika tatu<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ika ktatuhemo
    wink<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : n/a #no form listed in textbook

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) iv.aa p2.pl":
    alai<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktalaihemo
    weskhap<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : neweskahpihemo
    kwetk<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kwetkihemo
    wik<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kewikihemo
    anchinkx<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktahchinkxihemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) iv.aa p3.pl":
    achim<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : achimuwak
    ika tatu<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : ika totuwak
    wink<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : n/a #no form listed in textbook
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) iv.aa p3.pl":
    alai<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : alaiyok
    weskhap<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : wiskahpuwak
    kwetk<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kwetkiyok
    wik<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : wikuwak
    anchinkx<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : ahchinkxeyok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) iv.aa p1":
    kelixike<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkelixike
    ahponhe<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntahponhe
    patam<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpatama
    manaxe<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nemanaxe

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) iv.aa p1":
    ame<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ame
    penhatu<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpenhatu
    tkauxwe<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntkauxwe

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) iv.aa p2.sg":
    kelixike<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kelixike
    ahponhe<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktahponhe
    patam<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpatama
    manaxe<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemanaxe

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) iv.aa p2.sg":
    ame<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ame
    penhatu<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpenhatu
    tkauxwe<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktkauxwe

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) iv.aa p3.sg":
    kelixike<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kelixike
    ahponhe<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : ahponhe
    patam<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : patama
    manaxe<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : manaxe

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) iv.aa p3.sg":
    ame<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : ame
    penhatu<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : penhatu
    tkauxwe<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : tkauxwe

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) iv.aa p1.excl.pl": 
    kelixike<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkelixikehena
    ahponhe<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : ntahponhehena
    patam<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : mpatamahena
    manaxe<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : nemanaxehena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) iv.aa p1.excl.pl": 
    ame<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : amehena
    penhatu<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : mpenhatuhena
    tkauxwe<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : ntkauxwehena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    kelixike<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kelixikehena
    ahponhe<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktahponhehena
    patam<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kpatamahena
    manaxe<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kemanaxehena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    ame<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : amehena
    penhatu<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kpenhatuhena
    tkauxwe<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktkauxwehena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) iv.aa p2.pl":
    kelixike<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kelixikehemo
    ahponhe<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktahponhehemo
    patam<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kpatamahemo
    manaxe<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kemanaxehemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) iv.aa p2.pl":
    ame<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : amehemo
    penhatu<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kpenhatuhemo
    tkauxwe<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktkauxwehemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) iv.aa p3.pl":
    kelixike<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kelixikeyok
    ahponhe<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : ahponheyok
    patam<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : patamaok
    manaxe<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : manaxeyo #no "k" at coda in book? 

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) iv.aa p3.pl":
    ame<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : ameyok
    penhatu<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : penhatuwak
    tkauxwe<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : tkauxweyok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) iv.aa p1":
    ahkens<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkahkensi
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) iv.aa p2.sg":
    ahkens<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktahkensi
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) iv.aa p3.sg":
    ahkens<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : ahkensu
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) iv.aa p1.excl.pl": 
    ahkens<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntakensihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    ahkens<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktakensihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) iv.aa p2.pl":
    ahkens<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktakensihemo
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) iv.aa p3.pl":
    ahkens<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : ahkensuwak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 1) iv.aa p1":
    talawsu<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntalawsi
    pemin<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpemini
    maike<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nemaikei
    pechikwil<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpechikwila
    moihelan<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nemoihelana
    mimich<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nemimichi

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 2) iv.aa p1":
    elewens<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntelewensi
    pahunt<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpahunta
    welanak<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : newlanaka
    temikaht<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntemikahti
    tollahin<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntollahina

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 1) iv.aa p2.sg":
    talawsu<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktalawsi
    pemin<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpemini
    maike<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemaikei
    pechikwil<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpechikwila
    moihelan<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemoihelana
    mimich<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemimichi

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 2) iv.aa p2.sg":
    elewens<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktelewensi
    pahunt<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpahunta
    welanak<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kewelanaka
    temikaht<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktemikahti
    tollahin<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktollahina

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 1) iv.aa p3.sg":
    talawsu<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : talawsu
    pemin<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : peminu
    maike<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : maikei
    pechikwil<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : pwechikwila
    moihelan<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : moihelane
    mimich<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : mimichi

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 2) iv.aa p3.sg":
    elewens<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : elewensi
    pahunt<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : pahunte
    welanak<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : welanake
    temikaht<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : temikahtu
    tollahin<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : tollahine

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 1) iv.aa p1.excl.pl": 
    talawsu<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntalawsihena
    pemin<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : mpeminihena
    maike<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nemaikeihena
    pechikwil<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : mpechikwilahena
    moihelan<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nemoihelanahena
    mimich<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nemimichihena
